Wyoming, session 2026, SF0103.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 5-3-114 is created to read:
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450

5-3-114. Assignment of panels to resolve
constitutional issues.

(a) Upon written request of the attorney general or a
district attorney, a panel of three (3) district judges
shall be convened in accordance with this section for any
case or action commenced in which the constitutionality of
any statute or session law of this state is challenged. For
purposes of this subsection, a challenge requiring the
convening of a panel shall include any action challenging
the constitutionality of a statute or session law in which
an injunction restraining the enforcement, operation or
execution of the statute or session law is sought.

(b) Upon the filing of an action or case specified in
subsection (a) of this section or upon a party raising an
argument challenging the constitutionality of a statute or
session law in a filed case or action, the clerk of the
district court of the district in which the action or case
is filed shall immediately notify the state court
administrator.

SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
(c) The panel of district court judges for actions
and cases specified in this section shall consist of:

(i) One (1) district court judge of the district
in which the action or case was filed;

(ii) Two (2) district court judges from judicial
districts other than the district in which the action or
case was filed, selected at random by the state court
administrator.

(d) The judge with the most seniority of the three
(3) selected judges shall serve as presiding judge of the
panel. A majority of two (2) of the three (3) judges
selected under this section shall be sufficient to render a
decision in an action or case specified in this section.

(e) For cases or actions commenced in which the
constitutionality of any statute or session law of this
state is challenged, no one (1) district court judge shall
have the jurisdiction to issue a preliminary or permanent
injunction to enjoin or restrain the enforcement, operation
or execution of a statute or session law, provided that a
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
district court judge may issue a temporary restraining
order pending a hearing and determination by a panel
convened under this section. A hearing on an injunction
shall be held not later than thirty (30) days after the
issuance of any temporary restraining order under this
subsection.

(f) The proceedings for any action or case subject to
this section may be held in the judicial district in which
the action or case was filed or may be conducted using
electronic and video means in accordance with rules
promulgated by the judicial conference of district judges
created in W.S. 5-3-102(b).

(g) Any appeal from an order or decision by a panel
convened under this section shall be to the Wyoming supreme
court in accordance with the Wyoming rules of appellate
procedure.

Section 2. W.S. 1-28-102, 1-28-103, 1-37-102 and
5-1-106(f) are amended to read:

SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
1-28-102. Causes for injunction; granting temporary
order.

When it appears by the petition that the plaintiff is
entitled to relief consisting of restraining the commission
or continuance of some act the commission or continuance of
which during the litigation would produce great or
irreparable injury to the plaintiff, or when during the
litigation it appears that the defendant is doing,
threatens to do, or is procuring to be done some act in
violation of the plaintiff's rights respecting the subject
of the action and tending to render the judgment
ineffectual, a temporary order may be granted restraining
the act, subject to W.S. 5-3-114. The order may also be
granted in any case where it is specially authorized by
statute and by municipal ordinance adopted pursuant to W.S.
15-1-103(a)(xlvi).

1-28-103. When and by whom granted.

The injunction may be granted at the time of commencing the
action, or at any time before judgment, by the district
court or a judge thereof or a panel of judges convened
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
under W.S. 5-3-114, or in the absence from the county of
the judge, by the court commissioner of the county, when it
appears by affidavit of the plaintiff or his agent that the
plaintiff is entitled thereto. When an injunction has been
vacated during the pendency of the action in the district
court, and an appeal is taken to the supreme court from the
judgment or final order after trial in the district court,
an injunction may be granted at any time before judgment or
final order in the supreme court by a judge of the supreme
court, when it appears to the court or judge by affidavit
of the party or his agent that the party is entitled
thereto. Upon like proof, an injunction may also be allowed
by the supreme or district court or by a judge of either as
a temporary remedy, during the pendency of a case on error
or appeal. Any injunction entered in an action or case in
which the constitutionality of a statute or session law is
challenged shall be entered in accordance with W.S.
5-3-114.

1-37-102. Scope and general consideration.

(a) Courts of record within their respective
jurisdictions may declare rights, status and other legal
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
relations whether or not further relief is or could be
claimed. No proceeding is open to objection on the ground
that a declaratory judgment or decree is prayed for. The
declaration may be either affirmative or negative in form
and effect, and such declarations shall have the effect of
a final judgment.

(b) Actions filed under this chapter in which the
constitutionality of any statute or session law of this
state is challenged shall be resolved by a panel of
district court judges in accordance with W.S. 5-3-114.

5-1-106. Retirement of judges of the supreme court or
district courts; pension; assignment of retired judges.

(f) Any justice of the supreme court, chancery court
judge or district court judge of this state, who has
retired pursuant to the provisions of this section, and who
is not practicing law, may, notwithstanding his retirement,
be called upon, with his consent, at the request of a
district court judge or circuit court judge, with the
consent of the chief justice, or by the chief justice, and
assigned to service on any court. No retired justice or
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450
judge shall be assigned under this subsection to service on
any court in any case or cause of action in which the
constitutionality of any statute or session law of this
state is challenged, whether in the initial filing or in a
subsequent filing or hearing in the case or action. A
retired justice or judge shall receive as a salary during
any period of assignment an amount equal to the current
compensation of a judge of the court to which he is
assigned. The salary received by a retired justice or
judge during any period of assignment shall not affect the
receipt of any retirement allowance received by the retired
justice or judge during the period of assignment.
Assignments of retired justices or judges under this
section shall only be made in a manner that does not
jeopardize the qualified status of state retirement plans
established by the Wyoming legislature. When called to
serve, a retired judge or justice shall receive the same
per diem and travel allowances as allowed active judges or
justices. Per diem, allowances and compensation shall be
paid from the contingent fund of the court to which the
judge or justice is assigned.

Section 3.
SF0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0450

(a) This act shall apply to:

(i) All actions and cases commenced on and after
the effective date of this act;

(ii) All actions and cases filed before the
effective date of this act but in which a challenge to the
constitutionality of a statute or session law is raised on
and after the effective date of this act;

(iii) All assignments of retired justices and
judges made under W.S. 5-1-106, as amended by section 1 of
this act, on and after the effective date of this act.

(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect
the validity of any injunction or order issued before the
effective date of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0103